apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<pardef n="/VERBS_vowel__&#x632;&#x645;&#x648;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <i>آ</i>
        <p>
          <l>زمود</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes"/>
        <i>آ</i>
        <p>
          <l>زمود</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes"/>
        <i>یا</i>
        <p>
          <l>زمود</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <i>آ</i>
        <p>
          <l>زموده</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes"/>
        <i>آ</i>
        <p>
          <l>زموده</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes"/>
        <i>یا</i>
        <p>
          <l>زموده</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <i>آ</i>
        <p>
          <l>زما</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/>
        <i>یا</i>
        <p>
          <l>زما</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <i>آ</i>
        <p>
          <l>زما</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/>
        <i>یا</i>
        <p>
          <l>زما</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <i>آ</i>
        <p>
          <l>زما</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes"/>
        <i>آ</i>
        <p>
          <l>زما</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes"/>
        <i>یا</i>
        <p>
          <l>زما</l>
          <r>آزمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x6CC;&#x627;&#x641;&#x62A;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یافت</l>
          <r>یافتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یافته</l>
          <r>یافتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یاب</l>
          <r>یافتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یاب</l>
          <r>یافتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یاب</l>
          <r>یافتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یاب</l>
          <r>یافتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x6CC;&#x627;&#x631;&#x6CC;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یارید</l>
          <r>یاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یاریده</l>
          <r>یاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یار</l>
          <r>یاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یار</l>
          <r>یاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یار</l>
          <r>یاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>یار</l>
          <r>یاریدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="&#x6CC;&#x627;&#x631;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x6CC;&#x627;&#x631;&#x6CC;&#x62F;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x6CC;&#x627;&#x641;&#x62A;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x6CC;&#x627;&#x641;&#x62A;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x622;&#x632;&#x645;&#x648;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS_vowel__&#x632;&#x645;&#x648;&#x62F;"/></e>
